Nevada, session 83, AB249.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 218D.415 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218D.415 1. The summary of each bill or joint resolution
introduced in the Legislature must include the statement:
(a) “Fiscal Note: Effect on Local Government: May have Fiscal
Impact,”
“Fiscal Note: Effect on Local Government: No,” or
“Fiscal Note: Effect on Local Government: Increases or
Newly Provides for Term of Imprisonment in County or
City Jail or Detention Facility,”
 whichever is appropriate . [; and]
(b) “Effect on the State: [Yes,”] May have Fiscal Impact,”
“Effect on the State: No,”
“Effect on the State: Contains Appropriation from the State
General Fund included in Executive Budget,”
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
“Effect on the State: Executive Budget,” or
“Effect on the State: Contains Appropriation from the State
General Fund not included in Executive Budget,”
 whichever is appropriate.
(c) “Effect on the State Highway Fund: May have Fiscal
Impact,”
“Effect on the State Highway Fund: No,”
“Effect on the State Highway Fund: Contains
Appropriation from the State Highway Fund included in
Executive Budget,” or
“Effect on the State Highway Fund: Contains
Appropriation from the State Highway Fund not
included in Executive Budget,”
 whichever is appropriate.
2. The Legislative Counsel shall consult the Fiscal Analysis
Division to secure the appropriate information for summaries of
bills and joint resolutions.
3. If an amendment adds an appropriation to a bill that
previously did not include an appropriation or removes all
appropriations from a bill that previously included one or more
appropriations, the Legislative Counsel shall change the summary of
the bill to reflect the inclusion or removal.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 218D.475 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218D.475 1. Whenever a bill or joint resolution is submitted
to an agency for a fiscal note, the agency shall prepare the fiscal
note and return it to the Fiscal Analysis Division within 5 working
days. The Fiscal Analysis Division may extend the period for not
more than 10 additional working days if the matter requires
extended research.
2. Whenever a bill or joint resolution is submitted to a local
government for a fiscal note, the local government shall:
(a) Review the provisions of the bill or joint resolution to
determine whether the bill or joint resolution reduces the revenues
or increases the expenditures of the local government; and
(b) If the local government determines that the bill or joint
resolution reduces the revenues or increases the expenditures of the
local government, prepare a fiscal note for that bill or joint
resolution and return it to the Fiscal Analysis Division within 8
working days. The Fiscal Analysis Division may extend the period
for not more than 7 additional working days if the matter requires
extended research.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)